Missouri, session 2026, HB2860.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 162.961 and 167.027, RSMo, are repealed and three new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 162.106, 162.961, and 167.027, to read as
follows:
162.106. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Member", an individual elected or appointed to serve on a school board;
(2) "School board", a local school board, special administrative board, board of
education, board of directors, or governing board of a charter school that has general
control of the property and affairs of a school district or charter school.
2. Each member shall engage in conduct in the service of a school board in a
manner that complies with all provisions of law relating to conflicts of interest.
Members shall at all times make good-faith efforts to avoid the appearance of a conflict
of interest. Each member shall declare such member's interest in any instance in which
such member may have a potential conflict of interest arises and, as applicable, shall
refrain from debating or voting upon a question of engaging or using a business entity
that is the subject of the potential conflict of interest.
3. Each school board shall make public the disclosure of potential member and
employee conflicts of interest. The board's disclosure of such potential conflicts of
interest shall exclude compensation received as an employee, the payment of any tax,
fee, or penalty due to the school district, and any payment for providing utility services
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2860 2
to the school district. The board's disclosure of such potential conflicts of interest shall
contain at least the following information:
(1) Each transaction in excess of five hundred dollars per calendar year between
the school district and:
(a) A member;
(b) An employee;
(c) A superintendent;
(d) A chief purchasing officer or the equivalent;
(e) A general counsel employed full time; or
(f) Any individual related within the first degree of consanguinity to the
individuals listed in paragraphs (a) to (e) of this subdivision;
(2) Each transaction between the school district and a business entity in which
the individuals listed in paragraphs (a) to (f) of subdivision (1) of this subsection have a
substantial interest in excess of five hundred dollars;
(3) The identities of the parties in each transaction; and
(4) The dates of each transaction.
4. Each school superintendent, administrative staff school employee, chief
purchasing officer or the equivalent, and general counsel employed full time shall
disclose in writing the following information:
(1) The name and address of each employer or contractor from whom such
individual received income of one hundred dollars or more;
(2) The name and address of each sole proprietorship owned by such individual,
if any;
(3) The name, address, and general nature of business conducted by each
general partnership or joint venture in which such individual is or was a partner or
participant;
(4) The name and address of each partner or coparticipant in the general
partnership or joint venture unless the information is already filed with the Missouri
secretary of state;
(5) The name, address, and general nature of business of any closely held
corporation or limited partnership of which the individual owns or owned ten percent
or more;
(6) The name, address, and general nature of any publicly traded corporation or
limited partnership that is listed on a regulated stock exchange or automated quotation
system of which the individual owned two percent or more of any class of outstanding
stock, limited partnership units, or other equity interests; and

HB 2860 3
(7) The name and address of each corporation the individual served for the last
five years or for which the individual is serving in the capacity of director, officer, or
receiver.
5. No school district shall retain any attorney or law firm for the purpose of
providing counsel or litigating any administrative or legal proceeding concerning a
school district's decision regarding the evaluation or an individualized education
program of a student if such attorney or law firm employs or contracts with the school
district's members or employees.
162.961. 1. A parent, guardian or the responsible educational agency may request a
due process hearing before the administrative hearing commission with respect to any matter
relating to identification, evaluation, educational placement, or the provision of a free
appropriate public education of the child. Such request shall include the child's name,
address, school, issue, and suggested resolution of dispute if known. Except as provided in
subsection 4 of this section, the administrative hearing commission shall within fifteen days
after receiving notice assign a commissioner who is not an employee of the state board of
education or department of elementary and secondary education to hear the case.
Commissioners shall have some knowledge or training involving children with disabilities,
shall not have a personal or professional interest which would conflict with his or her
objectivity in the hearing, and shall meet the training and assessment requirements pursuant to
state regulations, federal law and regulation requirements of the Individuals With Disabilities
Education Act, and the requirements in section 621.253. No commissioner who conducts a
due process hearing shall have been employed within the last five years by a school district or
by an organization engaged in special education parent and student advocacy, performed
work for a school district or for a parent or student as a special education advocate within the
last five years as an independent contractor or consultant, been employed within the last five
years by the state board of education or department of elementary and secondary education,
or performed work for the state board of education or department of elementary and
secondary education within the last five years as an independent contractor or consultant, or
been party to a special education proceeding as an attorney, parent, or child. During the
pendency of any hearing, or prior to the assignment of the commissioner, the parties may, by
mutual agreement, submit their dispute to a mediator pursuant to section 162.959.
2. The parent or guardian, school official, and other persons affected by the action in
question shall present at the hearing all pertinent evidence relative to the matter under appeal.
All rights and privileges as described in section 162.963 shall be permitted. In hearings
relating to a child with a disability that are held under the federal Individuals with
Disabilities Act (IDEA) (20 U.S.C. Section 1400 et seq.), applicable state law, or rules or
regulations promulgated under such federal or state law, the burden of proof and the

HB 2860 4
burden of production shall be on the school district in any due process hearing
regarding any matter related to the identification, evaluation, reevaluation,
classification, educational placement, disciplinary action, or the provision of a free
appropriate public education of the child.
3. After review of all evidence presented and a proper deliberation, the commissioner,
within the [time lines] timelines required by the Individuals With Disabilities Education Act,
20 U.S.C. Section 1415 and any amendments thereto, shall determine its findings,
conclusions, and decision in the matter in question and forward the written decision to the
parents or guardian of the child and to the president of the appropriate local board of
education or responsible educational agency and to the department of elementary and
secondary education. A specific extension of the [time line] timeline may be made by the
commissioner assigned to the matter at the request of either party, except in the case of an
expedited hearing as provided in subsection 4 of this section.
4. An expedited due process hearing by the administrative hearing commission may
be requested by a parent to challenge a disciplinary change of placement or to challenge a
manifestation determination in connection with a disciplinary change of placement or by a
responsible educational agency to seek a forty-five school day alternative educational
placement for a dangerous or violent student. The administrative hearing commission shall
assign a commissioner to hear the case and render a decision within the [time line] timeline
required by federal law and state regulations implementing federal law. A specific extension
of the [time line] timeline is only permissible to the extent consistent with federal law and
pursuant to state regulations.
5. If the responsible public agency requests a due process hearing to seek a forty-five
school day alternative educational placement for a dangerous or violent student, the agency
shall show by substantial evidence that there is a substantial likelihood the student will injure
himself or herselfor others and that the agency made reasonable efforts to minimize that risk,
and shall show that the forty-five school day alternative educational placement will provide a
free appropriate public education which includes services and modifications to address the
behavior so that [it] such behavior does not reoccur, and continue to allow progress in the
general education curriculum.
6. Any due process hearing request and responses to the request shall conform to the
requirements of the Individuals With Disabilities Education Act (IDEA). Determination of
the sufficiency shall be made by the commissioner. The commissioner shall enforce the
process and procedures, including [time lines] timelines, required by the IDEA, related to
sufficiency of notice, response to notice, determination of sufficiency dispute, and
amendments of the notice.

HB 2860 5
7. A preliminary meeting, known as a resolution session, shall be convened by the
responsible public agency, under the requirements of the IDEA. The process and procedures
required by the IDEA in connection to the resolution session and any resulting written
settlement agreement shall be implemented. The responsible public agency or its designee
shall sign the agreement. The designee identified by the responsible public agency shall have
the authority to bind the agency. A local board of education, as a responsible public agency,
shall identify a designee with authority to bind the school district.
8. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, when conducting a due
process hearing, the administrative hearing commission shall conform all of its practices,
procedures, filing deadlines, and response times to the requirements of the Individuals With
Disabilities Education Act (IDEA).
9. (1) As used in this subsection, the following terms mean:
(a) "Parent", a parent, guardian, or other person having control or custody of a
student;
(b) "Proceeding", a proceeding conducted under this section including, but not
limited to, mediation if the school district or other public entity voluntarily agrees to
participate in mediation;
(c) "Stay put", remain in the student's present educational placement and
continue in the student's present eligibility status and special education and related
services, if any.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a student shall stay put
during the pendency of a proceeding.
(3) A parent or student, if the student is at least eighteen years of age or
emancipated, shall have ten days after the mediation concludes or after a party declines
to use mediation to file a request for a due process hearing to continue to invoke the
stay-put provisions of this subsection if the parties:
(a) Participate in mediation but such mediation fails to resolve the dispute
between the parties; or
(b) Do not agree to use mediation.
(4) Subdivision (2) of this subsection shall not apply if the school district and the
parent or student, if the student is at least eighteen years of age or emancipated, agree
that the student should not stay put during the pendency of the proceeding.
167.027. 1. As used in this section, "student special education record" means the
following:
(1) An individualized education program, or IEP, as such term is defined in 20 U.S.C.
Section 1401, as amended;

HB 2860 6
(2) An individualized family service plan, or IFSP, as such term is defined in 20
U.S.C. Section 1401, as amended; [and]
(3) A 504 plan created under Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973,
29 U.S.C. Section 794, as amended;
(4) A record produced for a child with a disability, as such term is defined in 20
U.S.C. Section 1401, as amended; and
(5) Other records produced for a child under the federal Individuals with
Disabilities Education Act (IDEA), as amended.
2. For the 2023-24 school year and all subsequent school years, a student special
education record shall be deemed a permanent record and shall be maintained as a part of a
child's cumulative scholastic record.
3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, rule, regulation, or policy to the
contrary, no school district or public school shall destroy a child's most recent student special
education record.
✔